District of Columbia statutes.
50-2003

Insurance discounts.

(a)

All insurance companies authorized to sell motor vehicle insurance in the District of Columbia shall provide a discount in the amount charged for a motor vehicle insurance policy to individuals 50 years of age and older who have successfully completed an approved course.

(b)

Any schedule of rates or any rating plan for a motor vehicle insurance policy approved by the Department of Insurance shall provide for an appropriate 2-year discount in the premiums for individuals 50 years of age and older who have successfully completed an approved course.

(c)

The requirement in subsection (b) of this section shall be satisfied if an insurance company’s schedule of rates or rating plan provides a discount in the premiums for all individuals 50 years of age and older based upon factors related to the individual’s age.

(d)

A certificate of completion issued pursuant to § 50-2002(c) shall qualify an individual for the discount set forth in subsection (b) of this section during the 2-year period immediately following issuance of the certificate.

(e)

An individual shall complete an approved course every 2 years in order to continue to be eligible for a discount in the premiums of a motor vehicle policy of insurance provided pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

Feb. 9, 1984, D.C. Law 5-46, §§ 5, 6, 30 DCR 5638
Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-51, § 2(c), 60 DCR 15155
1981 Ed., § 40-493.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-51 substituted “50 years of age” for “55 years of age” throughout the section.